District of Columbia statutes.
7-531.07

Demonstration projects.

In addition to the volunteer service credit program, the Mayor may establish service credit demonstration projects, such as an intergenerational service program involving recipients who would not otherwise qualify as “eligible persons” under § 7-531.01(2). Services provided through these demonstration projects shall earn service credits but shall not be covered by the provisions of § 7-531.05.

History

Sept. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-143, § 8, 33 DCR 4372

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-531.02 and § 7-531.11.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2247.